Utah statutes.
76-3-501.   Vehicle subject to forfeiture -- Seizure -- Procedure.
(1)  Any vehicle used in the commission of, attempt to commit, or flight after
commission of any felony in which a firearm or other dangerous weapon as
defined in Section 76-10-501, or explosive, chemical, or incendiary device or
parts as defined in Section 76-10-306 is used, or any vehicle used in the
commission of the illegal possession or sale of a firearm in or from the
vehicle, is subject to forfeiture.
(2)  Vehicles subject to forfeiture under this section may be seized by any
peace officer of this state upon process issued by any court having
jurisdiction over the vehicle.  However, seizure without process may be made
when:
(a)  the seizure is incident to a lawful arrest, with or without an arrest
warrant;
(b)  the vehicle is seized incident to a lawful search with or without a
search warrant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(c)  the vehicle subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment
in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding; or
(d)  the peace officer seizing the vehicle has probable cause to believe that
the vehicle has been used or is intended to be used in violation of this
section and the peace officer reasonably believes that the vehicle will be
lost, damaged, or used in further violation of law if the officer delays
seizure to obtain a warrant.
(3) Forfeiture proceedings under this section shall be instituted promptly in
accordance with the procedures and substantive protections of Title 24,
Chapter 1, Utah Uniform Forfeiture Procedures Act.
(4)  Any vehicle taken or detained under this section is not repleviable but
is in custody of the law enforcement agency making the seizure, subject only
to the orders and decrees of the court or the official having jurisdiction.
When a vehicle is seized under this chapter the appropriate person or agency
may:
(a)  remove the vehicle to a place designated by the court, official, or the
warrant under which the vehicle was seized; or
(b)  take custody of the vehicle and remove it to an appropriate location for
disposition in accordance with law.
